src-fst-stems-adverbs.lexc.md
# North Saami adverbs

* **LEXICON Adverb   **

First comes some multiword adverbs, declared as MWE in tok.txt
Of these, the ones going to adv are not treated as MWE in
abbr.txt and preprocess, whereas the ones going to
multiadv are treated as one unit in the syntax.
There are only a handful of words in the multiadv lexicon,
they are the ones that are mentioned in sme-dis.rle.
Goal: have mwe adverbs with syntactic behaviour as single
words going to multiadv.

Thereafter comes the ordinary adverb list.

Then comes the gradating advs

* type 1

* type 2a

* type 2b

* 2c

* 2d

* type 3a

* type 3b

* type 3c

Lexica for adverb subtypes

* **LEXICON LADJE     **

* **LEXICON DIHTE     **

* **LEXICON LAGAadv   **

* **LEXICON LAGAIDadv   **

* **LEXICON LEBBUIplc   **

* **LEXICON LEAPPOSplc   **

* **LEXICON gadv   **  adv that can form compounds

* **LEXICON gadv-plc   **  adv that can form compounds

* **LEXICON IL-adv-plc   **

* **LEXICON IL-adv-time   **

* **LEXICON LAS-adv   **

* **LEXICON LAS-adv-plc   **

* **LEXICON LAS-adv-time   **

* **LEXICON adv-plc   **

* **LEXICON adv-time   **

* **LEXICON adv-time-plc   **

* **LEXICON CSadv   **

* **LEXICON CSadvFoc/Neg-ge   **

* **LEXICON adv-subqst   **

* **LEXICON adv-comp   **

* **LEXICON adv-sup   **

* **LEXICON adv-plc-comp   **

* **LEXICON adv-plc-sup   **

* **LEXICON adv-time-comp   **

* **LEXICON adv-time-sup   **

* **LEXICON COMPADV   **

* **LEXICON plc-SUPADVmus   **

* **LEXICON plc-SUPADVmusj   **

The main adverb lexicon
* **LEXICON adv   ** simply gives the tag +Adv and directs to K

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc)</small>

---
